trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="obruč__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>â</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mjese/c__n">
      <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>com</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>câ</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="slučaj__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>â</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eva</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mudra/c__n">
      <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cem</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="muškar/ac__n">
      <e><p><l>ac</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>če</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cu</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cem</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aca</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cima</l><r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="evropejac"><i>Evropej</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Crnogorac"><i>Crnogor</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crnoburzijanac"><i>crnoburzijan</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crnac"><i>crn</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="školarac"><i>školar</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mjesec"><i>m</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>se</i><par n="mjese/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slučaj"><i>slučaj</i><par n="slučaj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čaj"><i>čaj</i><par n="slučaj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mrtvac"><i>mrtva</i><par n="mudra/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muškarac"><i>muškar</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ardijejac"><i>Ardijej</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bjegunac"><i>b</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>gun</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slovenac"><i>Sloven</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pojedinac"><i>pojedin</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarac"><i>jar</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moljac"><i>molj</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pilac"><i>pil</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="policajac"><i>policaj</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="magarac"><i>magar</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skakavac"><i>skakav</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pomorac"><i>pomor</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvorac"><i>tvor</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albanac"><i>alban</i><par n="muškar/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tjesnac"><i>t</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>sna</i><par n="mjese/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="madrac"><i>madra</i><par n="mjese/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brzac"><i>brza</i><par n="mjese/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maslac"><i>masla</i><par n="mjese/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prečac"><i>preča</i><par n="mjese/c__n"/></e>
